ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__čí">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ho</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ho</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ho</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ho</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="čí__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__čí"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="čí__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__čí"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__jaký">
      <e><p><l>ký</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kého</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kému</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kého</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kým</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kém</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cí</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kým</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ými</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ký</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kého</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kému</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ký</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kým</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kém</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kým</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kými</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ká</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kou</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kou</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kým</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kými</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kého</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kému</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ké</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kým</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kém</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ká</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kým</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ká</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kými</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kých</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ja/ký__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ký<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="BASE__jaký"/></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="jaký"><i>ja</i><par n="ja/ký__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="čí"><i>čí</i><par n="čí__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="čí"><i>čí</i><par n="čí__det"/></e>
